Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Advertising

6-54-201. Municipal advertising authorized — Special tax.

Advertising the commercial, social, agricultural, industrial, scenic, recreational, historical, educational, and other advantages, the points of interest and attractions within the various municipalities, and tourist promotion generally are declared to be a municipal purpose.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1), the official governing body of each municipality is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate from the general funds of such municipality a sum of money not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per annum for the purpose of advertising the commercial, social, agricultural, industrial, scenic, historical, educational, and other advantages, the points of interest and attractions therein for tourist promotion; provided, that a municipality and county that have consolidated under the metropolitan form of government, or where a municipality and county government have entered into a contractual agreement, the total appropriation may be a sum of money not to exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) per annum. Notwithstanding this subdivision (a)(1), the official governing body of a city whose primary industry is tourism is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate from the general funds and/or hotel/motel tax fund of such municipality whatever funds its governing body deems necessary to conduct tourist promotion.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than one hundred thirty-four thousand seven hundred (134,700) nor more than one hundred thirty-four thousand eight hundred (134,800), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the official governing body of the municipality is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate from the general funds and/or hotel/motel tax fund of the municipality whatever funds its governing body deems necessary to conduct tourist promotion.

The governing body of any municipal corporation is empowered to levy annually a special tax not to exceed two cents (2¢) on each one hundred dollars ($100) valuation of the annual tax aggregate, for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a fund for advertising the commercial, social, agricultural, industrial, scenic, historical, and educational advantages of the municipal corporation's community, and any points of interest and attraction, and for such other purposes as the bodies mentioned in this subsection (b), in their discretion, believe will increase the population, value of taxable property, and the general business prospects and the general welfare of their respective municipal corporations.

Acts 1937, ch. 163, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3336.1; Acts 1968, ch. 475, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-606; Acts 1983, ch. 63, § 1; 2008, ch. 1184, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-54-202. Expenditure of advertising funds.

The funds provided for in § 6-54-201(b) shall be used and expended under the direction and control of the governing body of the municipal corporation or through such agency or agencies as they shall prescribe, and under such rules and regulations as the governing body of the municipal corporation deems proper.

Acts 1937, ch. 163, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3336.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-607.

6-54-203. Election on advertising tax.

Should the governing body of any municipal corporation fail to levy such tax at the regular tax levy then, upon a petition containing the signatures of not less than five percent (5%) of the registered voters of the municipal corporation being presented to the governing body, such governing body shall call an election to be held at the next regular municipal election, at which time it shall be determined by a majority vote whether or not such tax shall be levied and collected to be used for any one (1) or more of such purposes.

The ballots used at the election shall be the ballots used in the next and regular municipal election; the election shall be held to determine the will of the voters as to whether the tax shall be levied, collected and used as mentioned in subsection (a). The election shall be held and conducted and notice given as other elections are now required by law to be held and notice thereof given.

The ballots used at the election shall contain, in substance, these words:”

For Advertising Tax Levy of cents

Against Advertising Tax Levy of cents

and the voters shall signify their will by putting an X mark opposite “For Advertising Tax Levy of cents” or “Against Advertising Tax Levy of cents.

At such election every voter qualified to vote in the regular municipal election shall be entitled to vote.

A majority vote of the votes cast “For Advertising Tax Levy of cents” and “Against Advertising Tax Levy of cents” shall determine the will of the voters. After the election has been held and the vote determined, the governing body of the municipal corporation where the election was held shall carry out the will of the voters.

Acts 1937, ch. 163, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3336.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-608.

6-54-204. Confidential records of city whose primary industry is tourism.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, records held by a city whose primary industry is tourism that address a specific amount of money expended in a given market for digital or traditional media or that address the specific detail of targeted audiences identified for marketing purposes may be treated as confidential and not subject to the open records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7. Nothing in this section shall prevent public disclosure of aggregate expenditure amounts for marketing activities at any time.

Acts 2016, ch. 974, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 974, § 2. April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.